Utah statutes.
16-10a-720.   Shareholders' list for meeting.
(1)  After fixing a record date for a shareholders' meeting, a corporation
shall prepare a list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to
be given notice of the meeting.  The list must be arranged by voting group,
and within each voting group by class or series of shares.  The list must be
alphabetical within each class or series and must show the address of, and the
number of shares held by, each shareholder.
(2)  The shareholders' list must be available for inspection by any
shareholder, beginning on the earlier of ten days before the meeting for which
the list was prepared or two business days after notice of the meeting is
given and continuing through the meeting and any meeting adjournments, at the
corporation's principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice
in the city where the meeting will be held.  A shareholder or a shareholder's
agent or attorney is entitled on written demand to the corporation and,
subject to the requirements of Subsections 16-10a-1602(3) and (7), and the
provisions of Subsections 16-10a-1603(2) and (3), to inspect and copy the
list, during regular business hours and during the period it is available for
inspection.
(3)  The corporation shall make the shareholders' list available at the
meeting, and any shareholder, or any shareholder's agent or attorney is
entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any
adjournment, for any purposes germane to the meeting.
(4)  If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder, or the shareholder's
agent or attorney, to inspect the shareholders' list before or at the meeting,
or to copy the list as permitted by Subsection (2), the district court of the
county where a corporation's principal office is located, or, if it has none
in this state, the district court for Salt Lake County, on application of the
shareholder, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the
corporation's expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was
prepared until the inspection or copying is complete.
(5)  If a court orders inspection or copying of the shareholders' list
pursuant to Subsection (4), unless the corporation proves that it refused
inspection or copying of the list in good faith because it had a reasonable
basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder or the shareholder's agent
or attorney to inspect or copy the shareholders' list:
(a)  the court shall also order the corporation to pay the shareholder's
costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred to obtain the order;
(b)  the court may order the corporation to pay the shareholder for any
damages incurred; and
(c)  the court may grant the shareholder any other remedy afforded by law.
(6)  If a court orders inspection or copying of the shareholders' list
pursuant to Subsection (4), the court may impose reasonable restrictions on
the use or distribution of the list by the shareholder.
(7)  Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders' list
does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.
